dev/apertium-ne-en.ne.dix
    <pardef n="दि__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नुहोस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नुस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एर</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>यौ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>यो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ढल्क__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ँदो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="झोक्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>किए</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="खाइ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लाग्दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="बाँच/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्न</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="हटाइ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>सक्नु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="चित्त__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>बुझ्दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="पार/्__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िदिऊँ</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुन्</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/हु__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हुन</l>
          <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हुनु</l>
          <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हुना</l>
          <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हुनै</l>
          <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हुनुहोस्</l>
          <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हुदो</l>
          <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हुदै</l>
          <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हुदा</l>
          <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हुने</l>
          <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>भई</l>
          <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppst"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>भैसकिस्</l>
          <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हु</l>
          <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>भयौ</l>
          <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>भयो</l>
          <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>भइस्</l>
          <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>भएछौ</l>
          <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>भएन</l>
          <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हुनेछ</l>
          <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हुनुपर्छ</l>
          <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हुदैन</l>
          <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>भएछ</l>
          <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="निस्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>कन</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>कँदा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="हुन__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेछु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>पुग्ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>पर्ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>सक्छ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="पार्"><i>पार</i><par n="पार/्__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="निस्"><i>निस्</i><par n="निस्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="खाइ"><i>खाइ</i><par n="खाइ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हु"><i></i><par n="/हु__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="दि"><i>दि</i><par n="दि__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हुन"><i>हुन</i><par n="हुन__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बाँच्"><i>बाँच</i><par n="बाँच/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="चित्त"><i>चित्त</i><par n="चित्त__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="भरभराउ"><i>भरभराउ</i><par n="ढल्क__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ढल्क"><i>ढल्क</i><par n="ढल्क__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="विग्र"><i>विग्र</i><par n="ढल्क__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="झोक्"><i>झोक्</i><par n="झोक्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पटाउ"><i>पटाउ</i><par n="ढल्क__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हटाइ"><i>हटाइ</i><par n="हटाइ__vblex"/></e>
